New York, session 2025-2026, S1716.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 602-a of the public health law, as 2 added by section 17 of part E of chapter 56 of the laws of 2013, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. Every municipality shall submit to the department [no more 5 frequently than every two years,] a community health assessment in 6 alignment with the state health improvement plan cycle and no more 7 frequently than every six years. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04795-02-5